test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_taalu2_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Noun - vuáru+v2: # ok VUARU
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáṛu
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáˊro
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáˊro
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáṛun
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáˊroost
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Com:  vuáˊroin
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊrottáá
    vuáru+v2+N+Ess:  vuárrun
    vuáru+v2+N+Par:  vuárrud
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáˊroh
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  vuáˊroi
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáˊroid
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáˊroid
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáˊroin
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊroiguin
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊroittáá
    
  Noun - puáđu+v2: # ok VUARU
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  puáđ̣u
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  puáˊđo
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  puáˊđo
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  puáđ̣un
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  puáˊđoost
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  puáˊđoin
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊđottáá
    puáđu+v2+N+Ess:  puáđđun
    puáđu+v2+N+Par:  puáđđud
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  puáˊđoh
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  puáˊđoi
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  puáˊđoid
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  puáˊđoid
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  puáˊđoin
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊđoiguin
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊđoittáá

  Noun - muátu+v2: # ok VUARU
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  muátu
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  muáˊđo
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  muáˊđo
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  muátun
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  muáˊđoost
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  muáˊđoin
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  muáˊđottáá
    muátu+v2+N+Ess:  muáttun
    muátu+v2+N+Par:  muáttud
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  muáˊđoh
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  muáˊđoi
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  muáˊđoid
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  muáˊđoid
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  muáˊđoin
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  muáˊđoiguin
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  muáˊđoittáá

  Noun - táálu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  tááḷu 
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  táˊlo
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  táˊlo
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  tááḷun
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  tááloost
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  táˊloin
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊlottáá
    táálu+v2+N+Ess:  táállun
    táálu+v2+N+Par:  táállud
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  táˊloh
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [tááloi, táˊloi]
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  táˊloid
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  táˊloid
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  táˊloin
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  táˊloiguin
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊloittáá

  Noun - stáálu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  stááḷu
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  stáˊlo
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  stáˊlo
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  stááḷun
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  stááloost
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  stáˊloin
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  stáˊlottáá
    stáálu+v2+N+Ess:  stáállun
    stáálu+v2+N+Par:  stáállud
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  stáˊloh
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [stááloi, stáˊloi]
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  stáˊloid
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  stáˊloid
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  stáˊloin
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  stáˊloiguin
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  stáˊloittáá

  Noun - láátu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  láˊđo
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  láˊđo
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđoost
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  láˊđoin
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊđottáá
    láátu+v2+N+Ess:  lááttun
    láátu+v2+N+Par:  lááttud
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  láˊđoh
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [lááđoi, láˊđoi]
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  láˊđoid
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  láˊđoid
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  láˊđoin
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  láˊđoiguin
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊđoittáá

  Noun - pááru+v2: # ok TAALU2
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  pááṛu
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  páˊro
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  páˊro
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  pááṛun
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  páároost
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Com:  páˊroin
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊrottáá
    pááru+v2+N+Ess:  páárrun
    pááru+v2+N+Par:  páárrud
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  páˊroh
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [páároi, páˊroi]
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  [páároid, páˊroid] # páároid hardcoded
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  páˊroid
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  páˊroin
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Com:  páˊroiguin
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊroittáá

  Noun - máátu+v2: # ok TAALU2
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  máátu
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  máˊđo
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  máˊđo
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  máátun
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  mááđoost
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  máˊđoin
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊđottáá
    máátu+v2+N+Ess:  mááttun
    máátu+v2+N+Par:  mááttud
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  máˊđoh
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [mááđoi, máˊđoi]
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  [mááđoid, máˊđoid] # mááđoid hardcoded
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  máˊđoid
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  máˊđoin
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  máˊđoiguin
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊđoittáá

  Noun - suájá: # á-stems - ok TAALU2
    suájá+N+Sg+Nom: suáj̣á    
    suájá+N+Sg+Gen: suáˊjá
    suájá+N+Sg+Acc: suáˊjá
    suájá+N+Sg+Ill: suáj̣án
    suájá+N+Sg+Loc: suáˊjáást
    suájá+N+Sg+Com: suáˊjáin
    suájá+N+Sg+Abe: suáˊjáttáá
    suájá+N+Ess: suáiján
    suájá+N+Par: suáijád
    suájá+N+Pl+Nom: suáˊjáh
    suájá+N+Pl+Gen: suáˊjái
    suájá+N+Pl+Acc: suáˊjáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Ill: suáˊjáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Loc: suáˊjáin
    suájá+N+Pl+Com: suáˊjáiguin
    suájá+N+Pl+Abe: suáˊjáittáá
